Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2405
Proceedings affecting devolution and administration; jurisdiction of subject matter.

Persons interested in decedents' estates may apply to the registrar for determination in the informal proceedings provided in this article, and may petition the court for orders in formal proceedings within the court's jurisdiction including but not limited to those described in this article. The court has jurisdiction of all proceedings to determine how decedents' estates subject to the laws of this state are to be administered, expended and distributed.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 83, UPC § 3-105.

This section was designed to give probate courts of limited jurisdiction broad concurrent jurisdiction with courts of general jurisdiction. Eagle Partners v. Rook, 301 Neb. 947, 921 N.W.2d 98 (2018).

During an estate proceeding, where the probate court is petitioned pursuant to this section to settle "demands or disputes regarding title of a decedent . . . to specific assets alleged to be included in the estate," as provided in section 30-2209(4), the probate court shall determine the relief sought only after providing notice and appropriate due process to other persons claiming, or having an interest in, such assets. In re Estate of Chaney, 232 Neb. 121, 439 N.W.2d 764 (1989).